Utah statutes.
53B-17-202.   Use of funds -- Rehabilitation building.

The funds, assets, and revenues shall be used for the construction, equipment, furnishings, and operation, or either or any of the same, on the campus of the university of a rehabilitation building, either as a separate structure or as an integrated unit in the University of Utah Medical Center.

